Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.045

Inspections.

To determine compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter, the director may inspect the mobile unit of any custom farm slaughterer and the premises of any custom slaughtering establishment or custom meat facility at any reasonable time.

[ 2000 c 99 s 5; 1987 c 77 s 8. Formerly RCW 16.49.690.]

NOTES:

Savings—1987 c 77: See note following RCW 16.49.015.